Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
APPEALS IN CRIMINAL PROCEEDINGS

§641-11 From circuit courts. Any party
aggrieved by the judgment of a circuit court in a criminal matter may appeal to
the intermediate appellate court, subject to chapter 602, in the manner and
within the time provided by the rules of court. The sentence of the court in a
criminal case shall be the judgment. All appeals shall be filed with the clerk
of the supreme court and shall be subject to one filing fee. [L 1892, c 95, §1;
am L 1919, c 44, §1; RL 1925, §2521; am L 1925, c 211, §1; am L 1931, c 37, §1;
RL 1935, §3550; RL 1945, §9551; RL 1955, §212-1; HRS §641-11; am L 1970, c 188,
§39; am L 1972, c 89, pt of §5; am L 1979, c 111, §6(2); gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 62, §1; am L 2004, c 202, §68; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Note

As to provision that sentence of the court is the judgment,
see §641-18, suspension of sentence, and HRPP rule 32(c), entry of judgment.

Rules of Court

Appeals, when taken, see HRAP rule 4.

Post-conviction proceedings and documents, see HRPP rule 40.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Application of the Collateral Order Doctrine to Criminal
Appeals in Hawai‘i. 19 UH L. Rev. 73 (1997).

Case Notes

For purposes of appeal, judgment of conviction is not final
where it does not include any sentence. 54 H. 485, 510 P.2d 88 (1973).

Where no notice of judgment is given, period for filing
appeal may be extended. 56 H. 444, 540 P.2d 61 (1971).

Failure of appointed counsel to give timely notice of appeal
did not foreclose defendant's right to appeal. 57 H. 268, 554 P.2d 236 (1976).

Where there is no announcement of the decision and no notice
of entry of judgment is given, time for filing notice of appeal does not run
until notice is in fact received. 59 H. 255, 580 P.2d 63 (1978).

Review of denial of reduction of sentences proper since new
standards of court discretion had been adopted. 60 H. 309, 588 P.2d 927
(1979).

Appeal permitted only from a final judgment or sentence. 63
H. 9, 619 P.2d 1076 (1980).

Jurisdictional defect in appeal cannot be waived by the
parties or disregarded by the appellate court. 63 H. 9, 619 P.2d 1076 (1980).

Where charges against criminal defendant were dismissed,
defendant was not an "aggrieved party" with standing to appeal an
order approving partial fees. 66 H. 366, 663 P.2d 630 (1983).

Where defendants contended there was another exception to
finality of judgment requirement of this section, specifically, that an order
denying a motion to dismiss an indictment based on double jeopardy grounds fell
into collateral order exception to final judgment rule, collateral order
exception permitted an interlocutory appeal of an order denying a pretrial
motion to dismiss an indictment on double jeopardy grounds. 77 H. 351, 884 P.2d
729 (1994).

Supreme court lacked appellate jurisdiction to hear
defendant's appeal of defendant's acquittal on count III kidnapping where
defendant was not an "aggrieved" party within the meaning of this
section; because defendant would remain under health director's custody based
on trial court's acquittals as to counts I and II, which would have warranted
convictions but for defendant's affirmative defense of insanity, defendant was
not aggrieved by trial court's acquittal on count III as acquittal did not
adversely impact defendant's rights. 102 H. 130, 73 P.3d 668 (2003).

Where the case was a criminal matter filed by plaintiff State
of Hawaii against defendant and the police department (HPD) was not a party to
the case, HPD, as a nonparty, was not authorized to appeal the respondent
judge's order denying HPD's motion to quash defendant's subpoena duces tecum
pursuant to this section if judgment was entered against defendant; HPD was
also not authorized to appeal the order pursuant to the interlocutory appeal
statute for defendants, §641-17, or the appeal statute for the prosecution,
§641-13; thus, having no remedy by way of appeal, HPD properly sought redress
from the order by mandamus. 122 H. 204, 225 P.3d 646 (2010).

Defendant not "aggrieved party" with standing to
appeal order granting partial fees. 6 H. App. 20, 709 P.2d 105 (1985).

Appellate court lacked jurisdiction under this section and
HRAP rule 4(b) where defendant failed to appeal within the thirty-day time
period mandated; defendant's motion to withdraw no contest plea did not
"reopen" final judgment such that order denying defendant's motion
became the appealable final judgment under this section and HRAP rule 4(b). 96
H. 462 (App.), 32 P.3d 106 (2001).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next